Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3208
Districts; proposed changes; procedure.

A hearing by the commission on proposed changes as provided by section 2-3207 may be initiated by any of the following methods:

(1) By the commission on its own motion;

(2) By written request of a majority of the directors of any or each natural resources district the boundaries of which are proposed to be changed or which is proposed to be merged or divided;

(3) By petition, signed by twenty-five percent of the legal voters residing within an area proposed to be transferred from one district to an adjoining district by a change in boundaries; or

(4) By formal written request of a majority of the directors or supervisors of any other special-purpose district wishing to merge with a natural resources district.

Such proposals shall be filed with the department and shall set forth any proposed new boundaries and such other information as the commission requires.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 8, p. 106;

Laws 1988, LB 1045, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 52.